Massachusetts, session 194th, H4337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting before
47CCC, the following section:-
Section 47AAA. Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A),
(C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by
agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth,
during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness
insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and
surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed
by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period
within which this provision is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which
provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any
person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision
is effective, shall provide coverage for cytological screenings and HPV screenings with no cost
sharing to the member.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
8DDD the following section:-
Section 8EEE. Any contract between a subscriber and a corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the Commonwealth
shall provide coverage for cytological screenings and HPV screenings with no cost sharing to the
member.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4DDD the following section:-
Section 4EEE. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the Commonwealth shall provide coverage for
cytological screenings and HPV screenings with no cost sharing to the member.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4VV the following section:-
Section 4WW. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide
coverage for the cost of annual cytological screenings and HPV screenings with no cost sharing
to the member.
of 2